Washington statutes.
RCW 12.08.090

Objections to pleadings—Amendment.

Either party may object to a pleading by his or her adversary, or to any part thereof that is not sufficiently explicit for him or her to understand it, or that it contains no cause of action or defense although it be taken as true. If the court deem the objection well-founded, it shall order the pleading to be amended; and if the party refuse to amend, the defective pleading shall be disregarded.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3022; Code 1881 s 1764; 1873 p 345 s 63; 1854 p 232 s 51; RRS s 1786.]